Utah statutes.
10-3b-505.   Ballot form.

The ballot at an election on a proposal to change the municipality's form of government shall:

(1)  state the ballot question substantially as follows: "Shall (state the municipality's name), Utah change its form of government to the (state "council-mayor form, with a five-member council," "council-mayor form, with a seven-member council," "six-member council form," or "five-member council form," as applicable)?"; and

(2)  provide a space or method for the voter to vote "yes" or "no."



Enacted by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

